Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.060

Information on proprietors' rights and responsibilities.

(1) The department of revenue shall inform proprietors of their rights and responsibilities regarding the public performance of copyrighted music as part of the business licensing service.

(2) Performing rights societies are encouraged to conduct outreach campaigns to educate existing proprietors on their rights and responsibilities regarding the public performance of copyrighted music.

[ 2016 c 38 s 6.]